Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.190

Violations relating to fraud, deceit, altering or misrepresenting, betting, or gambling—Penalty.

Any person, association, or organization operating any gambling activity may not, directly or indirectly, in the course of such operation:

(1) Employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud;

(2) Make any untrue statement of a material fact, or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statement made not misleading, in the light of the circumstances under which said statement is made;

(3) Engage in any act, practice, or course of operation as would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person;

(4) Alter or misrepresent the outcome of a game or other event on which wagers have been made after the outcome is made sure but before it is revealed to the players;

(5) Place, increase, or decrease a bet or to determine the course of play after acquiring knowledge, not available to all players, of the outcome of the game or any event that affects the outcome of the game or which is the subject of the bet or to aid anyone in acquiring such knowledge for the purpose of placing, increasing, or decreasing a bet or determining the course of play contingent upon that event or outcome;

(6) Knowingly entice or induce another person to go to any place where a gambling activity is being conducted or operated in violation of the provisions of this chapter, with the intent that the other person play or participate in that gambling activity;

(7) Place or increase a bet after acquiring knowledge of the outcome of the game or other event that is the subject of the bet, including past posting and pressing bets; or

(8) Reduce the amount wagered or cancel the bet after acquiring knowledge of the outcome of the game or other event that is the subject of the bet, including pinching bets. Any person, association, or organization that violates this section shall be guilty of a class C felony subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2020 c 127 s 6; 1991 c 261 s 7; 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 10; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 19.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2020 c 127: See notes following RCW 9.46.0364.